Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB64.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Identification device" means any item, application, or product that, using
radio frequency technology or any other electronic medium, is:
1. Passively or actively capable of transmitting personal information;
and
2. Used to:
a. Track or harass a person; or
b. Download personal information without permission;
(b) "Introduction" means subcutaneous injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any
other means of placement on or within the human body;
(c) "Personal information" means any of the following data elements that can
identify an individual, whether alone or in conjunction with any other
information:
1. Email, internet protocol, or website address;
2. Date of birth;
3. Motor vehicle operator's license number or personal identification
card number;
4. Any unique personal identifier number contained or encoded in a
motor vehicle operator's license or personal identification card issued;
5. Bank, credit card, or other financial institution account number;
6. Any unique personal identifier contained or encoded in a health
insurance, health benefit, or benefit card, or record issued in
conjunction with any government-supported aid program;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 16
7. Religion;
8. Ethnicity or nationality;
9. Photograph;
10. Fingerprint or other biometric identifier;
11. Social Security number;
12. Name; or
13. Any other unique personal identifier;
(d) "Require, coerce, or compel":
1. Means to cause a reasonable person of ordinary susceptibilities to
acquiesce to introduction of an identification device when he or she
otherwise would not, including but not limited to:
a. The use of any physical violence, threat, intimidation, or
retaliation; or
b. Conditioning the receipt of any private or public benefit or care
on consent to introduction of an identification device, including
employment, promotion, or other employment benefit; and
2. Does not include legitimate medical uses for which a patient or his or
her parent or guardian has consented; and
(e) "Subcutaneous" means located, administered, or introduced under the skin.
(2) A person shall not:
(a) Require, coerce, or compel any other person to undergo the introduction of
an identification device; or
(b) Introduce an identification device without the consent of the person to
whom the identification device is introduced.
(3) A person to whom an identification device is introduced in violation of subsection
(2) of this section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for:
(a) Actual damages;
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 16
(b) Compensatory damages;
(c) Punitive damages;
(d) Injunctive relief;
(e) Reasonable attorney's fees;
(f) Litigation costs, including but not limited to expert witness fees and
expenses; and
(g) Any other appropriate relief.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 413 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An action filed pursuant to Section 1 of this Act shall be commenced within seven (7)
years after the cause of action accrued.
Section 3. KRS 508.152 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as "vehicle" in KRS 186.010(8)(a);
(b) "Protective order" has the same meaning as in KRS 508.130; and
(c) "Tracking device" means an electronic or mechanical device that is designed
or intended to allow a person to remotely determine or track the position or
movement of another person or an object, regardless of whether that
information is recorded.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a tracking device when he or she intentionally:
(a) Installs or places a tracking device, or causes a tracking device to be installed
or placed:[,]
1. In or on a motor vehicle without the knowledge and consent of the
owner of the motor vehicle; or[,]
2. In or on a leased motor vehicle without the knowledge and consent of
either[if the motor vehicle is leased, ] the lessee or authorized operator
of the motor vehicle;
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 16
(b) Using a tracking device, tracks the location of:
1. A motor vehicle [with a tracking device ]without the knowledge and
consent of either the owner or[ the] authorized operator of the motor
vehicle; or[,]
2. A leased motor vehicle without the knowledge and consent of[ if the
motor vehicle is leased,] either the lessee or authorized operator of the
motor vehicle;
(c) While being the restrained party under a protective order, uses a tracking
device to track the location of a motor vehicle operated or occupied by an
individual protected under the order;[ or]
(d) While on probation or parole for a crime defined in KRS Chapter 508, uses a
tracking device to track the location of a motor vehicle operated or occupied
by a victim of the crime or by a family member of the victim of the crime
without the knowledge and consent of the victim or family member;
(e) Installs or places a tracking device, or causes a tracking device to be
installed or placed, on the person or property of another without the other
person's knowledge and consent; or
(f) Using a tracking device, tracks the location of another person without the
other person's knowledge and consent.
(3) Unlawful use of a tracking device is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to the installation or use of any:
(a) Device providing vehicle tracking for purposes of providing mechanical,
operational, directional, navigation, weather, or traffic information to the
operator of the vehicle;
(b) Device for providing emergency assistance to the operator or passengers of
the vehicle under the terms and conditions of a subscription service, including
any trial period of that subscription service;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 16
(c) Device for providing missing vehicle assistance for the benefit of the owner or
operator of the vehicle;
(d) Device providing diagnostic services regarding the mechanical operation of a
vehicle under the terms and conditions of a subscription service, including any
trial period of the subscription service;
(e) Device or service providing the lessee of the vehicle with clear notice that the
vehicle may be tracked. For a lessor who installs a tracking device subsequent
to the original vehicle manufacture, the notice shall be provided in writing
with an acknowledgment signed by the lessee, regardless of whether the
tracking device is original equipment, a retrofit, or an aftermarket product.
The requirement for written acknowledgment placed upon the lessor is not
imposed upon the manufacturer of the tracking device or the manufacturer of
the vehicle;
(f) Tracking device by the parent or guardian of a minor:
1. On any vehicle owned or leased by that parent or guardian of the minor,
and operated by the minor; or
2. On the person or property of the minor; or
(g) Tracking device by a police officer while lawfully performing his or her
duties as a police officer.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:38 PM Jacketed